Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Limited Access Facilities

177.220.
Definition of “limited access facility.”

For the purpose of KRS

177.220

to

177.310

, a limited access facility is defined as a highway or street especially designed for through traffic, and over, from or to which owners or occupants of abutting land or other persons have no right or easement or only a limited right or easement of access, light, air, or view by reason of the fact that their property abuts upon such limited access facility or for any other reason. Such highways or streets may be parkways, from which trucks, buses, and other commercial vehicles shall be excluded; or they may be freeways open to use by all customary forms of street and highway traffic.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 2.

177.230.
Establishment of limited access facilities — Regulation of use.

The highway authorities of the state, counties, cities, and towns, acting alone or in cooperation, with each other or with any federal, state, or local agency or any other state having authority to participate in the construction and maintenance of highways, are hereby authorized to plan, designate, establish, regulate, vacate, alter, improve, maintain, and provide limited access facilities for public use wherever such authority or authorities are of the opinion that traffic conditions, present or future, will justify such special facilities: provided, that within cities such authority shall be subject to such municipal consent as may be provided by law. Said highway authorities of the state, counties, cities, and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in KRS

177.220

to

177.310

, shall also have and may exercise, relative to limited access facilities, any and all additional authority now or hereafter vested in them relative to highways or streets within their respective jurisdictions. Said units may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such limited access facilities by the various classes of vehicles or traffic in a manner consistent with KRS

177.220

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 3; 2019 ch. 44, § 25, effective June 27, 2019.

177.240.
Design of facilities — Regulation of access.

The highway authorities of the state, county, city, and town are authorized to so design any limited access facility and to so regulate, restrict, or prohibit access as to best serve the traffic for which such facility is intended, and its determination of such design shall be final. In this connection, such highway authorities are authorized to divide and separate any limited access facility into separate roadways by the construction of raised curbings, central dividing sections, or other physical separations, or by designating such separate roadways by signs, markers, stripes, and the proper lane for such traffic by appropriate signs, markers, stripes, and other devices. No person shall have any right of ingress or egress to, from, or across limited access facilities to or from abutting lands, except at such designated points at which access may be permitted, upon such terms and conditions as may be specified from time to time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 4; 1984, ch. 213, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2006, ch. 173, § 27, effective July 12, 2006; 2019 ch. 44, § 26, effective June 27, 2019.

177.250.
Acquisition of property and property rights — Options to acquire — Administrative regulations.

For the purposes of KRS

177.220

to

177.310

, the highway authorities of the state, county, or city may acquire private or public property and property rights for limited access facilities and service roads, including rights of access, air, view, and light, by gift, devise, purchase, or condemnation in the same manner as such units are authorized by law to acquire property or property rights in connection with highways and streets within their respective jurisdiction. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all property rights acquired under the provisions of KRS

177.220

to

177.310

shall be in fee simple. In connection with the acquisition of property or property rights for any limited access facility or portion thereof, or service road in connection therewith, the state, county, or city highway authority may, in its discretion, acquire an entire lot, block, or tract of land, if by so doing, the interests of the public will be best served, even though said entire lot, block, or tract is not immediately needed for the right-of-way proper.

A city, county, or urban-county independently, or any combination of a city, county, or urban-county that have entered into an interlocal cooperative agreement under KRS

65.210

to

65.300

, may purchase options to acquire property or property rights on highways or streets within their respective jurisdictions if the property or property rights to be acquired are for highway projects included in:

The most recent twenty (20) year statewide transportation plan adopted by the Transportation Cabinet and submitted to the Federal Highway Administration;

The most recent six (6) year road plan enacted by the General Assembly;

The most recent long-range transportation plan adopted by a metropolitan planning organization and submitted to the Transportation Cabinet; or

The most recent recommendations of an area development district transportation committee that have been submitted to the Transportation Cabinet.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish guidelines governing the purchase of options under subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 5; 1966, ch. 255, § 163; 1998, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 40, effective June 25, 2009.

177.260.
Precedence of condemnation cases in courts.

Court proceedings necessary to acquire property or property rights for purposes of KRS

177.220

to

177.310

shall take precedence over all other causes not involving the public interest in all courts, to the end that the provision of limited access facilities may be expedited.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 6.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a city deeded its publicly owned right-of-way along a city street to the department of highways, the department could not assume the responsibility for, or the costs of relocating sewer lines and laterals located within the public way.

OAG 60-498

.

177.270.
Use of existing facilities — Grade crossing elimination — Public way connections.

The highway authority of the state, county, city, and town may designate and establish limited access highways as new and additional facilities or may designate and establish an existing street or highway as included within a limited access facility. The state or any of its subdivisions shall have authority to provide for the elimination of intersections at grade of limited access facilities with existing state and county roads, and city and town streets, by grade separation or service road, or by closing off such roads and streets at the right-of-way boundary line of such limited access facility; and after the establishment of any limited access facility, no highway or street which is not part of said facility shall intersect the same at grade. No city or town street, county or state highway or other public way shall be opened into or connected with any such limited access facility without the consent and previous approval of the highway authority in the state, county, city, or town having jurisdiction over such limited access facility. Such consent and approval shall be given only if the public interest shall be served thereby.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 7; 2019 ch. 44, § 27, effective June 27, 2019.

177.280.
Agreements of local governmental units respecting facilities.

The highway authorities of the state, city, county, and town are authorized to enter into agreements with each other, or with the federal government, respecting the financing, planning, establishment, improvement, maintenance, use, regulation, or vacation of limited access facilities or other public ways in their respective jurisdictions, to facilitate the purposes of KRS

177.220

to

177.310

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 8; 2019 ch. 44, § 28, effective June 27, 2019.

177.290.
Local service roads and streets.

In connection with the development of any limited access facility, the state, county, city, and town highway authorities are authorized to plan, designate, establish, use, regulate, alter, improve, maintain, and vacate local service roads and streets or to designate as local service roads and streets any existing road or street, and to exercise jurisdiction over service roads in the same manner as is authorized over limited access facilities under the terms of KRS

177.220

to

177.310

, if in their opinion such local service roads and streets are necessary or desirable. Such local service roads or streets shall be of appropriate design, and shall be separated from the limited access facility proper by means of all devices designated as necessary or desirable by the proper authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 9; 2019 ch. 44, § 29, effective June 27, 2019.

177.300.
Traffic rules on limited access facilities.

It is unlawful for any person (1) to drive a vehicle over, upon, or across any curb, central dividing section or other separation or dividing line on limited access facilities; (2) to make a left turn or a semicircular or U-turn except through an opening provided for that purpose in the dividing curb section, separation or line; (3) to drive any vehicle except in the proper lane provided for that purpose and in the proper direction and to the right of the central dividing curb, separation section, or line; (4) to drive any vehicle into the limited access facility from a local service road except through an opening provided for that purpose in the dividing curb, or dividing section or dividing line which separates such service road from the limited access facility proper.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 10.

177.305.
Prevention of spillage from trucks hauling coal.

All trucks hauling coal on a fully controlled limited access highway shall be covered by a tarp or equivalent cover to prevent spillage.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 415, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

177.310.
Declaration of policy.

The legislature hereby finds, determines, and declares that KRS

177.220

to

177.310

is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, and for the promotion of the general welfare.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 1.

177.315.
Spacing of access control points on limited access facilities for those having limited rights or easement of access.

As used in this section, “partial control of access” means the limited right or easement of access granted by the Transportation Cabinet under subsection (2) of this section.

The Transportation Cabinet shall establish minimum spacing requirements for partial control of access to a limited access facility, and the manner that the access is to be provided, for the owners or occupants of land or other persons who have a limited right or easement of access under KRS

177.220

. Minimum spacing between access points shall be one thousand two hundred (1,200) feet in rural areas and six hundred (600) feet in urban areas.

The Transportation Cabinet may change the spacing of access control points if:

An owner or occupant of land abutting a limited access facility requests the cabinet for the change; or

A local government requests the cabinet for the change; and

The change in spacing of access points is supported by an engineering and traffic study approved by the state highway engineer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 528, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 173, § 26, effective July 12, 2006.

177.317.
Hal Rogers Parkway — Access control and spacing.

The Transportation Cabinet shall allow partial control of access on the Hal Rogers Parkway, between the junction with KY 192 and the junction with KY 80, and establish minimum spacing requirements and the manner in which the access is to be provided. Minimum access spacing under this section shall be no less than one thousand two hundred (1,200) feet.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 147, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 94, § 1, effective March 24, 2009.